California, session 20252026, SB1328.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66271.2 of the Education Code is amended to read:66271.2. (a) (1) The Trustees of the California State University and the governing board of a community college district shall designate an employee at each of their respective main campuses as a point of contact for the needs of lesbian, gay, bisexual, asexual, pansexual, transgender, gender-nonconforming, intersex, and two-spirit faculty, staff, and students at the respective main campus. At minimum, the name and contact information of that designated employee shall be published on the internet website for the respective main campus, and shall be included in any of the main campus’s printed and online campus directories.(2) (A) The Trustees of the California State University and the governing board of a community college district shall designate an employee as a point of contact for the needs of lesbian, gay, bisexual, asexual, pansexual, transgender, gender-nonconforming, intersex, and two-spirit faculty, staff, and students of a branch campus, satellite location, or site other than the main campus by complying with either of the following:(i) Designating an additional employee under paragraph (1) for the branch campus, satellite location, or site other than the main campus.(ii) Requiring the employee described in paragraph (1) for the main campus to hold virtual or in-person office hours every week, every month, or regularly as determined by the employee, at a branch campus, satellite location, or site other than the main campus.(B) At minimum, the name and contact information of the employee described in subparagraph (A) shall be published on the internet website for the branch campus, satellite location, or site other than the main campus, and shall be included in any printed and online directories for the branch campus, satellite location, or site other than the main campus.(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:(A) “Branch campus” means a site other than the main campus or satellite location.(B) “Main campus” means the campus’s sole or primary teaching location.(C) “Satellite location” means an auxiliary classroom or teaching site within 50 miles of the main campus or a branch campus serving at least 100 students for at least one term. “Satellite location” does not include a site whose primary purpose is providing health care services, clinical training, research activities, or telehealth services, and that is not primarily used for classroom instruction. “Satellite location” does not include a dual enrollment program offered in partnership with a local educational agency that enrolls pupils in kindergarten or grades 1 to 12, inclusive. “Satellite location” does not include postsecondary educational classes for inmates of institutions or facilities under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.(b) An employee designated as a point of contact pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered a responsible employee for purposes of Section 66281.8 or Title IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681, et seq.). An employee designated as a campus point of contact pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not disclose confidential information provided to them by faculty, staff, or students about any alleged act of sexual harassment, sexual violence, or discrimination without the prior written consent of the person who provided the information to the designated employee.(c) An employee designated as a point of contact pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be the campus’s Title IX coordinator.(d) The University of California is requested to comply with this section. This section shall apply to the University of California only to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by appropriate resolution, make it applicable.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.